Missouri, session 2026, SB873.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 135.550, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 135.550,
to read as follows:
135.550. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Contribution", a donation of cash, stock, bonds
or other marketable securities, or real property;
(2) "Rape crisis center", a community-based nonprofit
rape crisis center, as defined in section 455.003, located
in this state and that provides the twenty-four-hour core
services of hospital advocacy and crisis hotline support to
survivors of rape and sexual assault;
(3) "Shelter for victims of domestic violence", a
facility located in this state which meets the definition of
a shelter for victims of domestic violence pursuant to
section 455.200 and which meets the requirements of section
455.220, or a nonprofit organization established and
operating exclusively for the purpose of supporting a
shelter for victims of domestic violence operated by the
state or one of its political subdivisions;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 873 2
(4) "State tax liability", in the case of a business
taxpayer, any liability incurred by such taxpayer pursuant
to the provisions of chapter 143, chapter 147, chapter 148,
and chapter 153, exclusive of the provisions relating to the
withholding of tax as provided for in sections 143.191 to
143.265 and related provisions, and in the case of an
individual taxpayer, any liability incurred by such taxpayer
pursuant to the provisions of chapter 143;
(5) "Taxpayer", a person, firm, a partner in a firm,
corporation or a shareholder in an S corporation doing
business in the state of Missouri and subject to the state
income tax imposed by the provisions of chapter 143, or a
corporation subject to the annual corporation franchise tax
imposed by the provisions of chapter 147, including any
charitable organization which is exempt from federal income
tax and whose Missouri unrelated business taxable income, if
any, would be subject to the state income tax imposed under
chapter 143, or an insurance company paying an annual tax on
its gross premium receipts in this state, or other financial
institution paying taxes to the state of Missouri or any
political subdivision of this state pursuant to the
provisions of chapter 148, or an express company which pays
an annual tax on its gross receipts in this state pursuant
to chapter 153, or an individual subject to the state income
tax imposed by the provisions of chapter 143.
2. A taxpayer shall be allowed to claim a tax credit
against the taxpayer's state tax liability, in an amount
equal to fifty percent of the amount such taxpayer
contributed to a shelter for victims of domestic violence or
rape crisis center for all fiscal years ending on or before
June 30, 2022, and seventy percent of the amount such
taxpayer contributed to a shelter for victims of domestic

SB 873 3
violence or rape crisis center for all fiscal years
beginning on or after July 1, 2022.
3. The amount of [the] any tax credit claimed under
subsection 2, 9, or 10 of this section shall not exceed the
amount of the taxpayer's state tax liability for the taxable
year that the credit is claimed, and such taxpayer shall not
be allowed to claim a tax credit in excess of fifty thousand
dollars per taxable year. However, any tax credit that
cannot be claimed in the taxable year the contribution was
made may be carried over only to the next succeeding tax
year. Tax credits issued pursuant to this section shall not
be assigned, transferred, or sold.
4. Except for any excess credit which is carried over
pursuant to subsection 3 of this section, a taxpayer shall
not be allowed to claim a tax credit under subsection 2 of
this section unless the total amount of such taxpayer's
contribution or contributions to a shelter or shelters for
victims of domestic violence or rape crisis center in such
taxpayer's taxable year has a value of at least one hundred
dollars.
5. The director of the department of social services
shall determine, at least annually, which facilities in this
state may be classified as shelters for victims of domestic
violence and rape crisis centers. The director of the
department of social services may require of a facility
seeking to be classified as a shelter for victims of
domestic violence or rape crisis center whatever information
is reasonably necessary to make such a determination. The
director of the department of social services shall classify
a facility as a shelter for victims of domestic violence or
rape crisis center if such facility meets the definition set
forth in subsection 1 of this section.

SB 873 4
6. The director of the department of social services
shall establish a procedure by which a taxpayer can
determine if a facility has been classified as a shelter for
victims of domestic violence or rape crisis center, and by
which such taxpayer can then contribute to such shelter for
victims of domestic violence or rape crisis center and claim
[a] the tax credit authorized under subsection 2 of this
section. Shelters for victims of domestic violence and rape
crisis centers shall be permitted to decline a contribution
from a taxpayer. The cumulative amount of tax credits which
may be claimed by all the taxpayers contributing to shelters
for victims of domestic violence and rape crisis centers in
any one fiscal year shall not exceed two million dollars for
all fiscal years ending on or before June 30, 2022. For all
fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2022, there shall
be no limit imposed on the cumulative amount of tax credits
that may be claimed by all taxpayers contributing to
shelters for victims of domestic violence and rape crisis
100 centers under the provisions of this section.
101 7. For all fiscal years ending on or before June 30,
102 2022, the director of the department of social services
103 shall establish a procedure by which, from the beginning of
104 the fiscal year until some point in time later in the fiscal
105 year to be determined by the director of the department of
106 social services, the cumulative amount of tax credits are
107 equally apportioned among all facilities classified as
108 shelters for victims of domestic violence and rape crisis
109 centers. If a shelter for victims of domestic violence or
110 rape crisis center fails to use all, or some percentage to
111 be determined by the director of the department of social
112 services, of its apportioned tax credits during this
113 predetermined period of time, the director of the department

SB 873 5
114 of social services may reapportion these unused tax credits
115 to those shelters for victims of domestic violence and rape
116 crisis centers that have used all, or some percentage to be
117 determined by the director of the department of social
118 services, of their apportioned tax credits during this
119 predetermined period of time. The director of the
120 department of social services may establish more than one
121 period of time and reapportion more than once during each
122 fiscal year. To the maximum extent possible, the director
123 of the department of social services shall establish the
124 procedure described in this subsection in such a manner as
125 to ensure that taxpayers can claim all the tax credits
126 possible up to the cumulative amount of tax credits
127 available for the fiscal year.
128 8. This section shall become effective January 1,
129 2000, and shall apply to all tax years after December 31,
130 1999.
131 9. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
132 2027, in addition to all other tax credits authorized under
133 this section, a taxpayer shall be allowed to claim a credit
134 against the taxpayer's state tax liability in an amount
135 equal to one thousand dollars if such taxpayer has converted
136 abandoned property, as such term is defined under section
137 447.700, into an operational shelter for victims of domestic
138 violence in the tax year for which the credit is sought.
139 10. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
140 2027, in addition to all other tax credits authorized under
141 this section, a taxpayer shall be allowed to claim a credit
142 against the taxpayer's state tax liability in an amount
143 equal to five hundred dollars if the taxpayer has rented
144 residential real estate to a victim of domestic violence, as
145 such term is defined under section 455.010, in the tax year

SB 873 6
146 for which the credit is sought. A taxpayer claiming a tax
147 credit pursuant to this subsection shall not disclose the
148 identity of any victim of domestic violence to whom the
149 taxpayer is renting residential real estate.
150 11. The department of social services and the
151 department of revenue may jointly promulgate all necessary
152 rules and regulations for the administration of subsections
153 9 and 10 of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as
154 that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created
155 under the authority delegated in this section shall become
156 effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
157 the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
158 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
159 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
160 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
161 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
162 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
163 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
164 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓